Utah statutes.
17-37-5.   Budget prepared by directors -- Fiscal year -- Tax levy.

The planetarium board of directors shall prepare an annual budget and estimate of expenditures and in all other respects comply with the requirements of the Uniform Fiscal Procedures Act for Counties and all other general laws relating to budgeting, accounting, disbursing of funds, and other financial matters applicable to counties. A county planetarium shall operate on the same fiscal year as the county and upon approval by the county legislative body of a final fiscal year budget submitted by the board of directors, the county legislative body may, at the time and in the manner prescribed by law for levying general county taxes, levy a tax for planetarium purposes, as provided in this chapter, which shall be sufficient to provide funds for the approved annual budget; but the tax levy imposed may not exceed in any one year .00004 of taxable value of taxable property in the county.



Amended by Chapter 227, 1993 General Session

